Utah statutes.
59-13-310.   Special fuel from out of state -- Reports required -- Contents
of reports.
(1)  Every person who delivers special fuel from outside the state to any
consignee within the state shall file with the commission on or before the
last day of each month a report on forms prescribed by the commission showing:
(a)  all deliveries of special fuel within the state during the preceding
month; and
(b)  the points of origin and original destination.
(2)  Where any consignment of special fuel was diverted in transit and
delivered within this state, the carrier making delivery of this consignment
shall report to the commission:
(a)  the place of the delivery of the consignment;
(b)  to whom the consignment was delivered;
(c)  the number of gallons of special fuel transported or delivered;
(d)  the date of delivery and the name of the consignor and of the consignee;
and
(e)  any other information the commission may require.
